dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  7892 Y 1
SFX  7892 0 נס/64992 .
SFX  10952 Y 1
SFX  10952 0 בותם/64992 .
SFX  5970 Y 1
SFX  5970 0 בותם/64993 .
SFX  13008 Y 1
SFX  13008 ט יט/64991 .
SFX  10351 Y 1
SFX  10351 0 נס/64997 .
SFX  9602 Y 1
SFX  9602 0 יתונו/64992 .
SFX  7635 Y 1
SFX  7635 ט יט/64992 .
SFX  12505 Y 1
SFX  12505 0 ידכן/64991 .
SFX  10048 Y 1
SFX  10048 ט יט/64993 .
SFX  6554 Y 1
SFX  6554 0 ידכן/64992 .
SFX  10817 Y 1
SFX  10817 0 ידכן/64993 .
SFX  10200 Y 1
SFX  10200 0 ידכן/64998 .
SFX  5652 Y 1
SFX  5652 0 שנה/64992 .
SFX  11621 Y 1
SFX  11621 0 שנה/64993 .
SFX  7491 Y 1
SFX  7491 0 שנה/64994 .
SFX  9523 Y 1
SFX  9523 0 יטוכם/64992 .
SFX  8420 Y 1
SFX  8420 ו ינוכן/64992 .
SFX  12533 Y 1
SFX  12533 0 ידותיכם/64991 .
SFX  6386 Y 1
SFX  6386 ו טית/64991 .
SFX  13446 Y 1
SFX  13446 0 ידותיכם/64993 .
SFX  12741 Y 1
SFX  12741 0 נע/64991 .
SFX  6615 Y 1
SFX  6615 0 נע/64992 .
SFX  11425 Y 1
SFX  11425 0 נע/64993 .
SFX  8460 Y 1
SFX  8460 0 תיותם/64993 .
SFX  12286 Y 1
SFX  12286 0 ירתני/64991 .
SFX  9600 Y 1
SFX  9600 0 ירתני/64992 .
SFX  5557 Y 1
SFX  5557 0 רויותיהם/64993 .
SFX  9111 Y 1
SFX  9111 0 סיכן/64991 .
SFX  13695 Y 1
SFX  13695 0 סיכן/64992 .
SFX  5296 Y 1
SFX  5296 0 סיכן/64993 .
SFX  13376 Y 1
SFX  13376 ו טה/64991 .
SFX  6574 Y 1
SFX  6574 0 ולוגיי/64993 .
SFX  8107 Y 1
SFX  8107 ו טה/64992 .
SFX  6418 Y 1
SFX  6418 0 ניותיי/64993 .
SFX  10697 Y 1
SFX  10697 0 בתיכם/64992 .
SFX  10602 Y 1
SFX  10602 ו טה/64998 .
SFX  11099 Y 1
SFX  11099 ו טה/64999 .
SFX  5181 Y 1
SFX  5181 0 ילהו/64992 .
SFX  11821 Y 1
SFX  11821 ב ובינו/64993 .
SFX  6387 Y 1
SFX  6387 0 סום/64991 .
SFX  10310 Y 1
SFX  10310 0 סום/64992 .
SFX  10951 Y 1
SFX  10951 0 בותן/64992 .
SFX  5969 Y 1
SFX  5969 0 בותן/64993 .
SFX  9601 Y 1
SFX  9601 0 יתוני/64992 .
SFX  7946 Y 1
SFX  7946 0 ימים/64991 .
SFX  13848 Y 1
SFX  13848 0 ימים/64992 .
SFX  13254 Y 1
SFX  13254 ם סלם/64991 .
SFX  12504 Y 1
SFX  12504 0 ידם/64991 .
SFX  11928 Y 1
SFX  11928 ם סלם/64992 .
SFX  9727 Y 1
SFX  9727 0 ימים/64994 .
SFX  6553 Y 1
SFX  6553 0 ידם/64992 .
SFX  11343 Y 1
SFX  11343 ם סלם/64993 .
SFX  10816 Y 1
SFX  10816 0 ידם/64993 .
SFX  12531 Y 1
SFX  12531 0 ידותינו/64991 .
SFX  13444 Y 1
SFX  13444 0 ידותינו/64993 .
SFX  10199 Y 1
SFX  10199 0 ידם/64998 .
SFX  7101 Y 1
SFX  7101 0 טנה/64992 .
SFX  13458 Y 1
SFX  13458 0 טנה/64993 .
SFX  8522 Y 1
SFX  8522 0 טנה/64994 .
SFX  9522 Y 1
SFX  9522 0 יטוכן/64992 .
SFX  8419 Y 1
SFX  8419 ו ינום/64992 .
SFX  12847 Y 1
SFX  12847 0 יאו/64991 .
SFX  12532 Y 1
SFX  12532 0 ידותיכן/64991 .
SFX  11781 Y 1
SFX  11781 0 יאו/64992 .
SFX  13445 Y 1
SFX  13445 0 ידותיכן/64993 .
SFX  10245 Y 1
SFX  10245 0 יאו/64993 .
SFX  8459 Y 1
SFX  8459 0 תיותן/64993 .
SFX  5545 Y 1
SFX  5545 0 ישנה/64992 .
SFX  5556 Y 1
SFX  5556 0 רויותיהן/64993 .
SFX  10674 Y 1
SFX  10674 0 יאו/64999 .
SFX  8312 Y 1
SFX  8312 0 עיו/64991 .
SFX  11768 Y 1
SFX  11768 ו זרו/64992 .
SFX  8308 Y 1
SFX  8308 0 עיהן/64991 .
SFX  7241 Y 1
SFX  7241 0 עיו/64993 .
SFX  7237 Y 1
SFX  7237 0 עיהן/64993 .
SFX  6417 Y 1
SFX  6417 0 ניותייך/64993 .
SFX  13633 Y 1
SFX  13633 0 יגי/64992 .
SFX  12820 Y 1
SFX  12820 0 יגי/64993 .
SFX  9504 Y 1
SFX  9504 0 יגי/64995 .
SFX  11544 Y 1
SFX  11544 0 כיכם/64991 .
SFX  10696 Y 1
SFX  10696 0 בתיכן/64992 .
SFX  13755 Y 1
SFX  13755 0 כיכם/64992 .
SFX  5670 Y 1
SFX  5670 0 כיכם/64993 .
SFX  11638 Y 1
SFX  11638 0 ובך/64993 .
SFX  13471 Y 1
SFX  13471 0 סון/64991 .
SFX  10309 Y 1
SFX  10309 0 סון/64992 .
SFX  12346 Y 1
SFX  12346 0 גע/64991 .
SFX  5838 Y 1
SFX  5838 0 גע/64992 .
SFX  12976 Y 1
SFX  12976 0 יתיכם/64991 .
SFX  11287 Y 1
SFX  11287 0 גע/64993 .
SFX  13705 Y 1
SFX  13705 0 יליהו/64992 .
SFX  10759 Y 1
SFX  10759 0 יתיכם/64992 .
SFX  12096 Y 1
SFX  12096 0 יתיכם/64993 .
SFX  12503 Y 1
SFX  12503 0 ידן/64991 .
SFX  12083 Y 1
SFX  12083 ל סנה/64991 .
SFX  9668 Y 1
SFX  9668 0 יליהו/64994 .
SFX  11791 Y 1
SFX  11791 ל סנה/64992 .
SFX  6552 Y 1
SFX  6552 0 ידן/64992 .
SFX  13475 Y 1
SFX  13475 ל סנה/64993 .
SFX  10815 Y 1
SFX  10815 0 ידן/64993 .
SFX  12530 Y 1
SFX  12530 0 ידיהם/64991 .
SFX  11433 Y 1
SFX  11433 ל סנה/64994 .
SFX  12109 Y 1
SFX  12109 0 ידיהם/64993 .
SFX  13356 Y 1
SFX  13356 ן עד/64992 .
SFX  6464 Y 1
SFX  6464 0 איים/64991 .
SFX  10198 Y 1
SFX  10198 0 ידן/64998 .
SFX  11330 Y 1
SFX  11330 ל סנה/64999 .
SFX  5554 Y 1
SFX  5554 0 רויותיי/64993 .
SFX  12033 Y 1
SFX  12033 0 יביה/64991 .
SFX  8310 Y 1
SFX  8310 0 עיך/64991 .
SFX  13790 Y 1
SFX  13790 0 יביה/64992 .
SFX  13160 Y 1
SFX  13160 ט יטני/64991 .
SFX  11899 Y 1
SFX  11899 ט יטני/64992 .
SFX  8315 Y 1
SFX  8315 0 יביה/64993 .
SFX  7239 Y 1
SFX  7239 0 עיך/64993 .
SFX  10649 Y 1
SFX  10649 0 יביה/64994 .
SFX  10062 Y 1
SFX  10062 ט יטני/64993 .
SFX  8418 Y 1
SFX  8418 ו ינון/64992 .
SFX  11790 Y 1
SFX  11790 ח יב/64992 .
SFX  12137 Y 1
SFX  12137 0 נותיכם/64991 .
SFX  6415 Y 1
SFX  6415 0 ניותיכם/64993 .
SFX  10634 Y 1
SFX  10634 0 נותיכם/64992 .
SFX  7117 Y 1
SFX  7117 0 נותיכם/64993 .
SFX  8458 Y 1
SFX  8458 0 תיותנו/64993 .
SFX  5555 Y 1
SFX  5555 0 רויותיו/64993 .
SFX  8311 Y 1
SFX  8311 0 עייך/64991 .
SFX  10947 Y 1
SFX  10947 0 טוך/64992 .
SFX  7240 Y 1
SFX  7240 0 עייך/64993 .
SFX  6416 Y 1
SFX  6416 0 ניותיך/64993 .
SFX  13780 Y 1
SFX  13780 0 ידיהו/64992 .
SFX  10863 Y 1
SFX  10863 0 ידיהו/64994 .
SFX  11543 Y 1
SFX  11543 0 כיכן/64991 .
SFX  10695 Y 1
SFX  10695 0 בתין/64992 .
SFX  13754 Y 1
SFX  13754 0 כיכן/64992 .
SFX  5669 Y 1
SFX  5669 0 כיכן/64993 .
SFX  11637 Y 1
SFX  11637 0 ובכם/64993 .
SFX  10308 Y 1
SFX  10308 0 סונו/64992 .
SFX  13470 Y 1
SFX  13470 0 סונו/64993 .
SFX  11972 Y 1
SFX  11972 ן תם/64991 .
SFX  9364 Y 1
SFX  9364 ן תם/64992 .
SFX  8650 Y 1
SFX  8650 0 הה/64991 .
SFX  5730 Y 1
SFX  5730 0 הה/64992 .
SFX  12975 Y 1
SFX  12975 0 יתיכן/64991 .
SFX  7485 Y 1
SFX  7485 0 הה/64993 .
SFX  13704 Y 1
SFX  13704 0 ילין/64992 .
SFX  10758 Y 1
SFX  10758 0 יתיכן/64992 .
SFX  12095 Y 1
SFX  12095 0 יתיכן/64993 .
SFX  12502 Y 1
SFX  12502 0 ידנו/64991 .
SFX  9667 Y 1
SFX  9667 0 ילין/64994 .
SFX  9878 Y 1
SFX  9878 ל סנו/64992 .
SFX  6551 Y 1
SFX  6551 0 ידנו/64992 .
SFX  10814 Y 1
SFX  10814 0 ידנו/64993 .
SFX  7211 Y 1
SFX  7211 ל סנו/64993 .
SFX  12529 Y 1
SFX  12529 0 ידיהן/64991 .
SFX  9714 Y 1
SFX  9714 0 הה/64999 .
SFX  12108 Y 1
SFX  12108 0 ידיהן/64993 .
SFX  11666 Y 1
SFX  11666 ן עה/64991 .
SFX  11754 Y 1
SFX  11754 ן עה/64992 .
SFX  11087 Y 1
SFX  11087 ל סנו/64998 .
SFX  10959 Y 1
SFX  10959 0 בותה/64992 .
SFX  10197 Y 1
SFX  10197 0 ידנו/64998 .
SFX  11329 Y 1
SFX  11329 ל סנו/64999 .
SFX  11037 Y 1
SFX  11037 0 ידנו/64999 .
SFX  5976 Y 1
SFX  5976 0 בותה/64993 .
SFX  5553 Y 1
SFX  5553 0 רויותייך/64993 .
SFX  12032 Y 1
SFX  12032 0 יביי/64991 .
SFX  7295 Y 1
SFX  7295 0 רתיכם/64992 .
SFX  6109 Y 1
SFX  6109 0 יביי/64993 .
SFX  6591 Y 1
SFX  6591 0 ינותה/64993 .
SFX  11519 Y 1
SFX  11519 0 יגן/64991 .
SFX  5698 Y 1
SFX  5698 0 יגן/64992 .
SFX  12136 Y 1
SFX  12136 0 נותיכן/64991 .
SFX  10887 Y 1
SFX  10887 0 יגן/64993 .
SFX  6414 Y 1
SFX  6414 0 ניותיכן/64993 .
SFX  11419 Y 1
SFX  11419 ה ותו/64998 .
SFX  10633 Y 1
SFX  10633 0 נותיכן/64992 .
SFX  7116 Y 1
SFX  7116 0 נותיכן/64993 .
SFX  9510 Y 1
SFX  9510 0 יגן/64998 .
SFX  11635 Y 1
SFX  11635 0 ובם/64993 .
SFX  7887 Y 1
SFX  7887 0 ורי/64991 .
SFX  13943 Y 1
SFX  13943 0 ורי/64992 .
SFX  13116 Y 1
SFX  13116 ן סות/64991 .
SFX  6467 Y 1
SFX  6467 0 ורי/64993 .
SFX  13779 Y 1
SFX  13779 0 ידין/64992 .
SFX  9746 Y 1
SFX  9746 0 ימוה/64992 .
SFX  13414 Y 1
SFX  13414 0 מרי/64991 .
SFX  13678 Y 1
SFX  13678 0 מרי/64992 .
SFX  10862 Y 1
SFX  10862 0 ידין/64994 .
SFX  12456 Y 1
SFX  12456 0 מרי/64993 .
SFX  10081 Y 1
SFX  10081 0 מרי/64995 .
SFX  11636 Y 1
SFX  11636 0 ובכן/64993 .
SFX  10307 Y 1
SFX  10307 0 סוני/64992 .
SFX  9363 Y 1
SFX  9363 ן תן/64992 .
SFX  7797 Y 1
SFX  7797 ה וב/64992 .
SFX  13703 Y 1
SFX  13703 0 יליני/64992 .
SFX  8809 Y 1
SFX  8809 0 לתהו/64992 .
SFX  9666 Y 1
SFX  9666 0 יליני/64994 .
SFX  12528 Y 1
SFX  12528 0 ידיו/64991 .
SFX  12828 Y 1
SFX  12828 0 יטת/64991 .
