dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.dic
אופו/5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,6344,6384,6385,6386,6387,6388,6389,64993
היא/9021,9894,10076,10324,10325,10326,10327,10328,10329,10330,10331,10332,10333,10334,10335,10336,10337,10338,10339,10340,10341,10342,10343,10344,10345,10346,10347,10348,10349,10350,10351,10352,10353,10354,64991
הישלו/5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5193,5636,6023,6024,6025,6026,6027,6028,6029,6030,6031,6032,10595,10596,10597,10598,10599,10600,10601,10602,10603,64994
המעט/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,10048,10057,10800,10801,10802,10803,10804,10807,10808,10809,64994
הסתת/5463,5533,5534,5535,5536,5537,5538,5539,5540,5541,5549,5550,5551,5552,5553,5554,5555,5556,5557,5558,5559,5739,6195,6198,6199,6200,6279,6282,6283,6288,6757,6758,6760,6761,6762,6763,6764,6765,6847,7046,7047,7048,7052,7056,7059,7062,7063,7064,64993
הפנו/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5208,5939,6822,7761,7762,7763,7764,7765,7766,7767,7768,7769,7770,7771,7772,7773,7774,7775,7776,7777,7778,7779,7780,7781,8390,8391,8392,8393,8394,8395,8396,8397,8398,10595,11098,11099,64992
כשכ/112,169,236,1254,2454,6281,6286,6287,6290,7040,7049,7053,7054,7060,7068,7069,7070,7489,7490,7491
כתמן/11972,64993
מגיי/5250,5258,5274,5873,8262,9051,9052,9056,9067,9079,9080,9098,9099,9110,9111,9112,9113,9115,9116,9117,9118,9119,9120,9121,9122,9123,9124,9125,9127,9128,9129,9130,9131,9132,9133,9134,9135,9136,9138,9139,64993
מיקרובי/6568,6569,6570,6571,6573,6574,6578,6579,64993
ממלט/5080,5082,5089,5093,5192,5193,5194,5365,5655,6118,6119,6120,6121,6122,6123,6124,6125,6126,6127,6155,6156,6157,6158,6159,6160,6161,6162,6163,6164,6165,6166,6167,6168,6169,6170,6171,6172,6173,6174,6175,6176,6177,12245,13008,13009,13010,13011,13012,13013,13014,64991
מתנע/5079,5084,5192,5194,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,5444,5454,5463,5736,8106,12175,12625,12741,13276,13277,64991
נול/5079,5084,5137,5192,5194,5228,5236,5243,5249,5322,5323,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,5455,5499,5713,5790,5819,5820,5824,6048,6049,6050,6051,6052,6071,6090,6201,6206,6207,6208,6544,6551,6552,6553,6554,6555,6556,6559,6560,6613,7656,7657,8131,64991
ננוע/6352,6615,7679,7966,11881,64992
נקמו/5123,5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,5419,5735,8107,64999
נתאם/7786,11836,11928,64992
נתפר/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5009,5016,5025,5054,5066,5067,5068,5069,5070,5071,5072,5073,5074,5075,5093,5124,5192,5193,5194,5373,5374,5375,5457,5493,5639,5735,5770,6316,6465,6576,7892,8220,8221,8222,8223,8338,8340,8341,64991
סניו/5444,5454,5463,5736,5737,5738,13376,64993
ציוו/5397,6972,7807,7808,7809,7810,7812,9601,9602,9603,9604,9605,9606,9607,10753,10754,10755,10756,10757,10758,10759,10760,10761,10762,10763,10764,10765,10766,10767,10768,10769,10770,10771,64992
קופו/5080,5125,5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,5372,6343,6384,6385,6386,6388,6389,7244,7248,8793,64993
קריי/5742,6413,6414,6415,6416,6417,6418,6419,6420,6421,6422,6423,6424,6425,6426,6427,6428,6429,6430,6431,7193,7194,7195,7196,7197,7198,7199,7200,7201,7202,7203,64993
ראשי/8458,8459,8460,8461,8462,8463,8464,8465,8466,64991
רדיו/5255,5262,5263,5266,5275,5286,5287,5294,5295,5296,5297,5298,5299,5300,5301,5302,5303,7803,13474,64991
רימו/5001,5003,5004,5006,5007,5008,5080,5084,5094,5125,5126,5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5133,5134,5135,5136,5138,5139,5140,5141,5142,5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,5372,6114,7025,7026,7027,7028,7029,7030,7031,8413,8414,8415,8416,8417,8418,8419,8420,8421,8422,8423,8424,64992
תגיי/5483,5492,5493,5496,5498,5500,5501,5507,5561,10307,10308,10309,10310,10311,10312,10313,11885,13692,13693,13694,13695,13696,64993
תמלט/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5009,5016,5028,5205,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5707,5922,5923,5924,5926,5927,5928,6107,6822,7635,7636,7637,7638,7639,11851,13908,64992
תפרו/5507,5652,6079,6634,6795,64993
